North Carolina, session 2025, HB839.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 115C-301.3(7) reads as rewritten:
"(7) Classroom excellence teacher. – A classroom teacher serving in an advanced
teaching role who assumes and maintains responsibility for at least twenty
percent (20%) of additional students as compared to the most recent prior
school year in which the teacher did not receive a salary supplement pursuant
to this section.more students than other classrooms of the same grade level or
subject area at the same school."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 115C-301.7(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Class Size Flexibility. – Notwithstanding G.S. 115C-301, with the approval of the
State Board of Education, ATR schools may exceed the maximum class size requirements for
kindergarten through third grade during any term of up to three years in which State funds are
awarded to the ATR unit where the school is located. At the conclusion of the term, any class
size flexibility approved for an ATR school pursuant to this subsection shall expire.grade."
SECTION 1.(c) G.S. 115C-310.13(a) reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-310.13. Advanced teaching roles salary supplements.
(a) ATR units may designate up to fifteen percent (15%) twenty-five percent (25%) of
the teachers in each ATR school as adult leadership teachers and five percent (5%) ten percent
(10%) of the teachers in each ATR school as classroom excellence teachers. To the extent funds
are made available for the purpose, teachers serving in an advanced teaching role are eligible to
receive salary supplements as follows:
(1) Ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for adult leadership teachers.
(2) Three thousand dollars ($3,000) for classroom excellence teachers."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 school year.
*H839-v-1*